Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.170

Transcribing mutilated records—Original records to be preserved.

All the original record books, after the transcribing thereof, shall be filed away in the auditor's office and only be used in case of contest on the correctness of the transcribed records.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.32.170. Prior: 1893 c 14 s 3; RRS s 4067.]